District of Columbia statutes.
7-1141.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Behavioral health” means a person’s overall social, emotional, and psychological well-being and development.

(2)

“Behavioral health services” means stand-alone and co-occurring, integrated treatment services for substance abuse and mental health disorders that are designed to promote a person’s behavioral health.

(3)

“Comprehensive Psychiatric Emergency Program” or “CPEP” means a 24-hour/7-days a week program providing emergency psychiatric evaluation and stabilization.

(4)

“Department” means the Department of Behavioral Health.

(5)

“Director” means the Director of the Department of Behavioral Health.

(6)

“Recovery” means a process of change through which individuals improve their health and wellness, live a self-directed life, and strive to reach their full potential.

(7)

“Recovery support services” means substance abuse treatment, care coordination, and community-based support that promote recovery.

(8)

“Substance abuse” means a pattern of pathological use of a drug or alcohol that causes impairment in social or occupational functioning or produces physiological dependency evidenced by physical tolerance or physical symptoms when the drug or alcohol is not used.

History

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5112, 60 DCR 12472

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5112 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) DHS MOU for substance abuse treatment, see § 5132 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5112 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) DHS MOU for substance abuse treatment, see § 5132 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 5111 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle J of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act of 2013”.

Section 5131 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle L of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Department of Human Services Memorandum of Understanding Authority for Substance Abuse Treatment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Section 5132 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that for fiscal year 2014, the Department of Human Services (“DHS”) shall enter into a Memorandum of Understanding of up to $2.5 million with the Department of Behavioral Health (“DBH”) for a substance abuse treatment program for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (“TANF”) clients. DHS shall work with DBH, other agencies, and community-based experts as necessary to establish an integrated system of care for TANF beneficiaries living with barriers, including mental health disorders, alcohol and substance abuse, and HIV/AIDS. DHS shall present the integrated system of care plan to the Committee on Human Services no later than December 1, 2013.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.